dev/verbs-apertium-kaz-tat.kaz.lexc
LEXICON V-FINITE-REGULAR_NEGATIVE

! Finite forms
%<aor%>:%>%{E%} # ;                         !
%<fut_plan%>:%>%{M%}%{A%}%{K%} # ;       ! future plan
%<ifi%>:%>%{D%}%{I%} # ;                    !
%<past%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н # ;               !
%<ifi_evid%>:%>%{I%}пт%{I%} # ;         ! evidential recent past

LEXICON V-NONFINITE-IRREGULAR_NEGATIVE

! Cont. classes to be checked

! Participles
%<prc_perf%>:%>%{I%}п # ;
%<prc_perf%>:%>%{o%}%{I%}п # ;            ! Dir/LR
%<neg%>%<prc_perf%>:%>%{M%}%{A%}%>%{E%} # ;
%<prc_plan%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}л%{I%} # ;
%<prc_vol%>:%>%{G%}%{I%} # ;


! Verbal adverbs
%<gna_perf%>:%>%{I%}п # ;
%<neg%>%<gna_perf%>:%>%{M%}%{A%}%>%{E%} # ;

%<gna_until%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}нш%{A%} # ;
%<gna_after%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}л%{I%} # ;


! Verbal Adjectives
%<gpr_fut%>:%>%{A%}р # ;
%<neg%>%<gpr_fut%>:%>%{M%}%{A%}%>%с # ;
!%<neg%>%<gpr_pot2%>:%>%{G%}%{I%}с # ; FIXME looks wrong


! Gerunds
%<ger_fut%>:%>%{A%}р # ;
%<neg%>%<ger_fut%>:%>%{M%}%{A%}%>с # ;

%<ger_ppot%>:%>%{A%}р%>л%{I%}к # ;
%<neg%>%<ger_ppot%>:%>%{M%}%{A%}%>сл%{I%}%{K%} # ;

LEXICON V-NONFINITE-REGULAR_NEGATIVE

! Cont. classes to be checked

! Participles
%<prc_cond%>:%>с%{A%} # ;
%<prc_impf%>:%>%{E%} # ;

! Verbal adverbs
%<gna_cond%>:%>с%{A%} # ;

! Gerunds
%<ger_past%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н # ;
%<ger_perf%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н%>%{L%}%{I%}%{K%} # ;
%<ger_impf%>:%>%{E%}т%{I%}н # ;
%<ger%>:%>у # ;
%<ger_abs%>:%>у%>ш%{I%}%>%{L%}%{I%}%{K%} # ;

! Verbal adjectives
%<gpr_past%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н # ;
%<gpr_impf%>:%>%{E%}т%{I%}н # ;
%<gpr_pot%>:%>у%>ш%{I%} # ;

! Imperatives
%<imp%>%<p2%>%<sg%>: # ;
%<imp%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>%{I%}ң%>д%{A%}р # ;
%<imp%>%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>%{I%}ң%{I%}з # ;
%<imp%>%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>%{I%}ң # ; ! Dir/LR FIXME CHECK
%<imp%>%<p2%>%<frm%>%<pl%>:%>%{I%}ң%{I%}з%>д%{A%}р # ;

! Optative/jussive forms
%<opt%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{A%}й%{I%}н # ;
!%<opt%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>%{G%}%{I%}н # ;              ! FIXME check
%<opt%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>с%{I%}н # ;
%<opt%>%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{A%}й%{I%}%{K%} # ;
!%<opt%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>%{G%}%{I%}л%{A%} # ;         ! FIXME check
%<opt%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>с%{I%}н # ;

!%<opt%>%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>%{G%}%{I%}л%{A%} # ;  ! FIXME check
!%<opt%>%<p2%>%<frm%>%<pl%>:%>%{G%}%{I%}л%{A%} # ;  ! FIXME check

LEXICON V-COMMON

V-FINITE-REGULAR_NEGATIVE ;
%<neg%>:%>%{M%}%{A%} V-FINITE-REGULAR_NEGATIVE ;

V-FINITE-IRREGULAR_NEGATIVE ;

V-NONFINITE-REGULAR_NEGATIVE ;
%<neg%>:%>%{M%}%{A%} V-NONFINITE-REGULAR_NEGATIVE ;

V-NONFINITE-IRREGULAR_NEGATIVE ;

LEXICON V-DER

%<coop%>:%>%{I%}с V-COMMON ;

LEXICON V-TV

%<v%>%<tv%>: V-COMMON ;
!%<v%>%<tv%>: V-DER ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>:%>%{I%}%{l%} V-COMMON ;

LEXICON V-IV

%<v%>%<iv%>: V-COMMON ;
!%<v%>%<iv%>: V-DER ;

LEXICON V-TD ! Temporary lexicon

%<v%>%<TD%>: V-COMMON ;
!%<v%>%<iv%>: V-DER ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!     auxiliary verbs

LEXICON Vinfl-AUX-IMPF

%<vaux%>%<pres%>: # ; ! /жүр, жатыр, тұр, отыр/ as part of multiword present form

LEXICON Vinfl-AUX

%<vaux%>: V-COMMON ;          ! these four verbs in other tenses and all other aux. verbs

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!     copula

LEXICON Copula

е%<cop%>%<ger_past%>:екен POSSESSION ;
е%<cop%>%<ger_perf%>:екен%>%{L%}%{I%}к POSSESSION ;

е%<cop%>%<neg%>:емес V-PERS-COP-SUF ;
е%<cop%>%<evid%>:екен V-PERS-COP-SUF ;
е%<cop%>%<neg%>%<evid%>:емес% екен V-PERS-COP-SUF ;
е%<cop%>%<ifi%>:е%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-PAST ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!     PRONOUN'S INFLECTION

!!!!!!!   P E R S O N A L

LEXICON PRON-12SG-CASES

%<gen%>:енің CLIT ;
%<dat%>:аған CLIT ;
%<acc%>:ені CLIT ;
%<abl%>:енен CLIT ;
%<loc%>:енде CLIT ;
%<ins%>:енімен CLIT ;
%<px%>:енікі%{n%} CASE ;
%<loc%>:ендегі ATTR/SUBST ;
%<sim%>:ендей CLIT ;
%<adv%>:еніңше CLIT ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS-INFL

CASE-ETC ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS

мен%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:мен CLIT ;
мен%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:м PRON-12SG-CASES ;

сен%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:сен CLIT ;
сен%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:с PRON-12SG-CASES ;

ол%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ол CLIT ;
ол%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:оның CLIT ;
ол%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:оған CLIT ;
ол%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:оны CLIT ;
ол%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<abl%>:одан CLIT ;
ол%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:онда CLIT ;
ол%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<ins%>:онымен CLIT ;
ол%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<px%>:онікі%{n%} CASE ;
ол%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:ондағы ATTR/SUBST ;
ол%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<sim%>:ондай CLIT ;
ол%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<adv%>:оныңша CLIT ;

біз%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>:біз PRON-PERS-INFL ;
біз%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<adv%>:біздіңше CLIT ;

сендер%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:сендер PRON-PERS-INFL ;
сендер%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<adv%>:сендерше CLIT ;

олар%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:олар PRON-PERS-INFL ;
олар%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<adv%>:оларша CLIT ;

сіз%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<frm%>:сіз PRON-PERS-INFL ;
сіз%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<frm%>%<adv%>:сіздіңше CLIT ;
сіздер%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<frm%>:сіздер PRON-PERS-INFL ;
сіздер%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<frm%>%<adv%>:сіздерше CLIT ;

!!!!!!!   D E M O N S T R A T I V E

! FIXME CHECK (CLIT-GENERAL vs CLIT) I can't imagine forms like "бумын, бусың" etc.
! in Tatar, but not sure how it works in Kazakh /I.S./
!-----
! Good idea is to link prn.dem.sim forms alternatively to CLIT and CASE,
! so that it's "adverbial reading" (e.g. "шундый каты кычкырды") doesn't
! receive <nom> tag /IS/

LEXICON PRON-DEM-INFL

%<gen%>:ның CLIT ;
%<dat%>:ған CLIT ;
%<acc%>:ны CLIT ;
%<abl%>:дан CLIT-GENERAL ;
%<abl%>:нан CLIT-GENERAL ; ! Dir/LR FIXME actually only "осы" seems to take this.
%<loc%>:да CLIT-GENERAL ;
%<px%>:нікі%{n%} CASE ;
%<loc%>:ндагы ATTR/SUBST ;
%<sim%>:ндай CASE ;
%<adv%>:лай CLIT-GENERAL ;
%<qnt%>:нша CLIT ;         !

%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р CASE-ETC ;
%<pl%>%<px3sp%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р%{I%}%{n%} CASE ;

! Commented out till these forms get implemented in tat.lexc too
!%<TD%>:шалық CLIT ;        ! "that much"  ! FIXME: check cont lex
!%<reas%>%<abl%>:ндықтан # ; ! "because of"  ! FIXME: not attested with осы?

! FIXME: 1) link the below to PRON-DEM-INFL if possible
!            (later, once we are certain about things)

LEXICON PRON-DEM-BUL

! FIXME CHECK (бұны vs мұны) Grammars I have list only forms with "б", but variants
! starting with "м" seem to be more frequent in the (wikipedia) corpus /I.S./
!-----
! <s>FIXME</s> (бұл%<prn%>%<dem%>%<pl%>:бұлар N-INFL-COMMON ;) N-INFL-COMMON might lead to
! overgeneration with p1,p2 possessives (they seem to take onle <px3sp> ending);
! on the other hand, with something like бу%<prn%>%<dem%>%<px3sp%>:монысы%{n%} CASE ;
! we loose things like бу<prn><dem><pl><px>:боларныкы /I.S./

бұл%<prn%>%<dem%>%<nom%>:бұл CLIT-GENERAL ;
бұл%<prn%>%<dem%>%<gen%>:бұның CLIT ;
бұл%<prn%>%<dem%>%<gen%>:мұның CLIT ; ! Dir/LR
бұл%<prn%>%<dem%>%<dat%>:бұған CLIT ;
бұл%<prn%>%<dem%>%<acc%>:бұны CLIT ;
бұл%<prn%>%<dem%>%<acc%>:мұны CLIT ; ! Dir/LR
бұл%<prn%>%<dem%>%<abl%>:бұдан CLIT-GENERAL ;
бұл%<prn%>%<dem%>%<loc%>:бұнда CLIT-GENERAL ;
бұл%<prn%>%<dem%>%<loc%>:мұнда CLIT-GENERAL ; ! Dir/LR
бұл%<prn%>%<dem%>%<ins%>:бұнымен CLIT ;
бұл%<prn%>%<dem%>%<ins%>:мұнымен CLIT ; ! Dir/LR
бұл%<prn%>%<dem%>%<px%>:мұнікі%{n%} CASE ; ! FIXME: check "м" vs "б"
бұл%<prn%>%<dem%>%<loc%>:бұндағы ATTR/SUBST ;
бұл%<prn%>%<dem%>%<loc%>:мұндағы ATTR/SUBST ; ! Dir/LR
бұл%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sim%>:мұндай CASE ;
бұл%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sim%>:бұндай CASE ; ! Dir/LR
бұл%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sim%>%<px3sp%>:мұндай%{I%}%{n%} CASE ;
бұл%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sim%>%<pl%>:мұндайлар CASE ;
бұл%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sim%>%<pl%>%<px3sp%>:мұндайлары%{n%} CASE ;
бұл%<prn%>%<dem%>%<adv%>:былай CLIT-GENERAL ;
бұл%<prn%>%<dem%>%<qnt%>:мұнша CLIT ;
бұл%<prn%>%<dem%>%<px3sp%>:бұнысы%{n%} CASE ;

бұл%<prn%>%<dem%>%<pl%>:бұлар CASE-ETC ;
бұл%<prn%>%<dem%>%<pl%>%<px3sp%>:бұлары%{n%} CASE ;

 LEXICON Verbs 
адымда:адымда V-IV ; ! "to step"
азарла:азарла V-TV ; ! "укорять,упрекать"
азына:азына V-IV ; ! "howl,neigh"
айналдыр:айналдыр V-TV ; ! "to turn" NOTE caus
айналыс:айналыс V-IV ; ! "undertake something,choose an occupation"
ақса:ақса V-IV ; ! "хромать"
аласта:аласта V-TV; ! "drive out,banish,stigmatize,ostracize"
алтында:алтында V-TV ; ! "gild,cover with gold"
алын:алын V-IV ; ! "be taken,be gathered,be collected,be raised,be levied,be deducted" NOTE passive
алыстыр:алыстыр V-TV ; ! "set (on),urge on,incite"
андат:андат V-TD ; ! "to show" FIXME
аңғырттан:аңғырттан V-TV ; ! "to display carelessness"
арқанда:арқанда V-TV ; ! "to tie"
арт:арт V-IV ; ! "augment,rise/увеличиваться,умножаться"
ас:ас V-TV ; ! "prepare food"
атқар:атқар V-TV ; ! "исполнять,выполнять"
ауна:ауна V-IV ; ! "to turn/валяться"
ашулан:ашулан V-TV ; ! "to be angry"
әлектен:әлектен V-IV ; ! "have trouble,be tormented"
бағыс:бағыс V-TV ; ! "educate,look after" (kaz tat) coop
балпылда:балпылда V-IV ; ! "to mumble"
бас:бас V-TV ; ! "давить,вставать;печатать"
бекітіл:бекітіл V-IV ; ! "to be confirmed" (kaz tat) passive
бер:бер V-TV ; ! "давать,отдавать,сдавать"
болдыр:болдыр V-IV ; ! "to get tired"
бөл:бөл V-TV ; ! "separate"
бүріс:бүріс V-IV ; ! "to shrink"
бүрмеле:бүрмеле V-TV ; ! "to pleat (a dress)"
бырш:бырш V-IV ; ! "to get overcurdled (of sour milk)"
дамыт:дамыт V-TV ; ! ""
демал:демал V-IV ; ! "отдыхать"
ез:ез V-TV ; ! "squish"
еңкей:еңкей V-IV ; ! "bend"
ескер:ескер V-TV ; ! "pay attention"
жағалас:жағалас V-IV ; ! "to catch one another by throat" (kaz tat) coop
жақтыр:жақтыр V-TV ; ! "одобрять"
жалында:жалында V-IV ; ! "to flame"
жарылқа:жарылқа V-TV ; ! "" (tat) caus
жат:жат V-IV ; ! "lie"
жерле:жерле V-TV ; ! "to bury"
жоғал:жоғал V-IV ; ! "lose"
жусат:жусат V-TV ; ! "to let rest" (kaz tat) caus
жыла:жыла V-IV ; ! "cry,weep"
зертте:зертте V-TV ; ! "research"
кеңес:кеңес V-IV ; ! "to consult"
кешір:кешір V-TV ; ! "forgive"
күл:күл V-IV ; ! "laugh"
қағыстыр:қағыстыр V-TV ; ! "устраивать,подыскать"
қадамда:қадамда V-IV ; ! "to pace off"
қала:қала V-TV ; ! "класть"
қалықта:қалықта V-IV ; ! "to soar"
қаңыра:қаңыра V-IV ; ! "be desolate"
қапта:қапта V-TV ; ! "обшивать"
қатыс:қатыс V-IV ; ! "participate"
қаша:қаша V-TV ; ! "to cut down"
қораздан:қораздан V-IV ; ! "to be on one's high horse"
қорша:қорша V-TV ; ! "to surround"
құлшын:құлшын V-IV ; ! "to show readiness"
құтқар:құтқар V-TV ; ! "save"
қысыра:қысыра V-IV ; ! "to be barren" (tat) trimm
лақтыр:лақтыр V-TV ; ! "cast,fling"
межеле:межеле V-TV ; ! "draw a boundary line"
мойынсұн:мойынсұн V-IV ; ! "obey unquestioningly"
ойна:ойна V-TV ; ! "play"
оңайлан:оңайлан V-IV ; ! "to become easy"
өлеңдет:өлеңдет V-TV ; ! "sing"
өл:өл V-IV ; ! "die,sink"
өт:өт V-TV ; ! ""
піш:піш V-TV ; ! "to cut" (tat) trimm
пысына:пысына V-IV ; ! "to rot"
самарқаулан:самарқаулан V-IV ; ! "to become apathetic" (tat) trimm
саттыр:саттыр V-TV ; ! "to offer for sale" (kaz tat) caus
соғ:соғ V-IV ; ! "hit,strike"
соттастыр:соттастыр V-TV ; ! "to compel" (tat) trimm
суарыл:суарыл V-IV ; ! "to be given to drink" (kaz tat) passive
сыр:сыр V-TV ; ! "stitch"
тақымда:тақымда V-IV ; ! "to press"
тарылт:тарылт V-TV ; ! "to dry up" (kaz tat) caus
татулас:татулас V-IV ; ! "to make peace"
тілдес:тілдес V-TV ; ! "to talk for the last time (with someone who is dying)"
торал:торал V-IV ; ! "to get well"
түзе:түзе V-TV ; ! "исправлять"
тыйын:тыйын V-IV ; ! "to suppress"
тындыр:тындыр V-TV ; ! "давать покой" (tat) trimm
ұзар:ұзар V-IV ; ! "get longer"
ұр:ұр V-TV ; ! "hit"
шанышқыла:шанышқыла V-TV ; ! "to puncture" (tat) trimm
шашаулан:шашаулан V-IV ; ! "to repulse"
шөмелеле:шөмелеле V-TV ; ! "to pile in shocks"
шыда:шыда V-IV ; ! "put up,take it"
ысыл:ысыл V-IV ; ! "to acquire a habit"
жат:жатыр Vinfl-AUX-IMPF ; ! 
жүр:жүр Vinfl-AUX-IMPF ; ! 
отыр:отыр Vinfl-AUX-IMPF ; ! 
тұр:тұр Vinfl-AUX-IMPF ; ! 
ал:ал Vinfl-AUX ; ! 
баста:баста Vinfl-AUX ; !
бер:бер Vinfl-AUX ; !
біт:біт Vinfl-AUX ; !
бол:бол Vinfl-AUX ; !
ет:ет Vinfl-AUX ; ! ""
жазда:жазда Vinfl-AUX ; !
жат:жат Vinfl-AUX ; ! 
жүр:жүр Vinfl-AUX ; ! 
кел:кел Vinfl-AUX ; !
кет:кет Vinfl-AUX ; ! 
қал:қал Vinfl-AUX ; ! 
отыр:отыр Vinfl-AUX ; ! 
сал:сал Vinfl-AUX ; ! 
тұр:тұр Vinfl-AUX ; ! 
шық:шық Vinfl-AUX ; !
